Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2307.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2509.8(f)(i) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 2509.8. Extraordinary Special Education Program Expenses.--* * *(f) (i) For the 2016-2017 school year [and each school year thereafter] through the 2025-2026 school year, an amount equal to one percent (1%) of the special education appropriation shall be distributed to school districts and charter schools for extraordinary expenses incurred in providing a special education 1234567891011121314151617181920 program or service to one or more students with disabilities as approved by the Secretary of Education. Such special education program or service shall include, but not be limited to, the transportation of students with disabilities; services related to occupational therapy, physical therapy, speech and language, hearing impairments or visual impairments; or training in orientation and mobility for children who are visually impaired or blind.* * *( h) For the 2026-2027 school year and each school year thereafter, an amount equal to two percent (2%) of the special education appropriation shall be distributed to school districts and charter schools for extraordinary expenses incurred in providing a special education program or service under section 1372(8)(vi) to one or more students with disabilities as approved by the Secretary of Education. The following shall apply:(1) No more than one percent (1%) of the special education appropriation may be distributed to school districts and charter schools as follows:(i) Funds distributed under this clause shall be allocated for each student for which all the following are met:(A) Expenses for the student incurred on an annual basis are greater than the maximum threshold of Category 3A as provided for under section 1372(8).(B) The expenses associated with the application represent at least one percent (1%) of the school district's total special education expenditures as reported in the most recent annual financial reports submitted in accordance with section 218.(C) The student has been enrolled in the school district for 20260HB2307PN3040 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 no more than two (2) consecutive school years.(ii) The department shall prioritize applications with the highest rates under subclause (i)(B).(2) No more than one percent (1%) of the special education appropriation may be distributed to school districts and charter schools as follows:(i) Money distributed under this clause shall be allocated for each student for which all the following are met:(A) Expenses for the student incurred on an annual basis are greater than the maximum threshold of Category 3A as provided in section 1372(8).(B) The student has been enrolled in the school district or charter school for no more than two (2) consecutive school years.(ii) The department shall prioritize applications with the highest expenses under subclause (i)(A).(3) The following shall apply to money distributed to a school district or a charter school under this subsection:(i) A school district or charter school may not receive an aggregate amount under this subsection in any school year which exceeds the greater of:(A) the total amount of funding available multiplied by the percentage equal to the school district or charter school's percentage of the State's special education students enrolled in the school district or charter school; or(B) double the maximum threshold of Category 3A as provided for under section 1372(8).(ii) The department may distribute uncommitted, unexpended funds to school districts that submitted a referendum exception under section 333(f)(v) of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st 20260HB2307PN3040 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Taxpayer Relief Act, for the current or prior fiscal year.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2307PN3040 - 4 - 123